Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-308
City of Lincoln; duties.

Within six months after September 9, 1993, the city of Lincoln shall prepare for preliminary review regulations implementing the design review process in accordance with the Nebraska State Capitol Environs Act and shall adopt such regulations as an amendment to its zoning code within twelve months after September 9, 1993.

Laws 1993, LB 271, § 5.